Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.502

Child care facility revolving fund—Purpose—Source of funds.

(1) A child care facility revolving fund is created. Money in the fund shall be used solely for the purpose of starting or improving a child care facility pursuant to RCW * 43.31.085 and 43.31.502 through 43.31.514. Only moneys from private or federal sources may be deposited into this fund.

(2) Funds provided under this section shall not be subject to reappropriation. The child care facility fund committee may use loan and grant repayments and income for the revolving fund program.

(3) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the child care facility revolving fund to the state general fund.

[ 2020 c 357 s 914; 1991 c 248 s 1; 1989 c 430 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.31.085 was repealed by 1993 c 280 s 81, effective June 30, 1996.

Effective date—2020 c 357: See note following RCW 43.79.545.

Legislative findings—1989 c 430: "The legislature finds that increasing the availability and affordability of quality child care will enhance the stability of the family and facilitate expanded economic prosperity in the state. The legislature finds that balancing work and family life is a critical concern for employers and employees. The dramatic increase in participation of women in the workforce has resulted in a demand for affordable child care exceeding the supply. The future of the state's workforce depends in part upon the availability of quality affordable child care. There are not enough child care services and facilities to meet the needs of working parents, the costs of care are often beyond the resources of working parents, and facilities are not located conveniently to workplaces and neighborhoods. The prospect for labor shortages resulting from the aging of the population and the importance of the quality of the workforce to the competitiveness of Washington businesses make the availability of quality child care an important concern for the state's businesses.

The legislature further finds that a partnership between business and child care providers can help the market for child care adjust to the needs of businesses and working families and improve productivity, reduce absenteeism, improve recruitment, and improve morale among Washington's labor force. The legislature further finds that private and public partnerships and investments are necessary to increase the supply, affordability, and quality of child care in the state." [ 1989 c 430 s 1.]

Severability—1989 c 430: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1989 c 430 s 12.]